Utah statutes.
76-7-308.5.   Administration of anesthetic or analgesic to an unborn child.

A physician who performs an abortion of an unborn child who is at least 20 weeks gestational age shall administer an anesthetic or analgesic to eliminate or alleviate organic pain to the unborn child that may be caused by the particular method of abortion to be employed, if the woman having the abortion consents to the administration of an anesthetic or analgesic to the unborn child, unless the physician is prevented from administering the anesthetic or analgesic by a medical emergency.



Enacted by Chapter 57, 2009 General Session

